South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S907.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Natural Resources, relating to Verifiable Documentation, designated as Regulation Document Number 5440, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The South Carolina Department of Natural Resources (SCDNR) proposes to promulgate regulation relating to the determination of verifiable documentation for limited commercial blue crab license renewal eligibility as required in Section 50-5-400(H), to create an effective and efficient process and to ensure proper, equitable and fair renewal of commercial licenses as it pertains to the privilege of harvest of the State's public trust resources. The Notice of Drafting was published in Volume 49, Issue No. 10 of the South Carolina State Register on October 24, 2025. ----XX----